pl: Szybkość spalania: Standardowe spalanie; Wolne spalanie; Inne
sv: Brinnhastighet: Normal brinnhastighet; Långsam brinnhastighet; Övrigt
ja: 燃焼速度: レギュラー; スロー; その他
nb: Brennhastighet–: Normal brennhastighet; Sakte brennhastighet; Annet
zh-CN: 燃烧速率: 正常燃烧; 缓慢燃烧; 其他
vi: Tốc độ cháy: Cháy thường; Cháy chậm; Khác
bg-BG: Скорост на изгаряне: Нормално горене; Бавно горене; Друго
ko: 연소율: 레귤러 번; 슬로우 번; 기타
zh-TW: 燃燒速率: 正常燃燒; 緩慢燃燒; 其他
cs: Rychlost hoření: Běžné hoření; Pomalé hoření; Jiné
ro-RO: Viteză de ardere: Ardere normală; Ardere lentă; Altele
fi: Palamisnopeus: Normaali palaminen; Hidas palaminen; Muu
hu: Égési sebesség: Normál égésű; Lassú égésű; Egyéb
it: Velocità di combustione: Combustione regolare; Combustione lenta; Altro
es: Tasa de combustión: Combustión normal; Combustión lenta; Otra
tr: Yanma hızı: Normal yanma; Yavaş yanma; Diğer
da: Forbrændingshastighed: Almindelig forbrænding; Langsom forbrænding; Andet
sl-SI: Burn rate: Običajno izgorevanje; Počasno izgorevanje; Drugo
pt-PT: Taxa de queima: Combustão normal; Combustão lenta; Outro
en: Burn rate: Regular burn; Slow burn; Other
fr: Vitesse de combustion: Combustion normale; Combustion lente; Autre
th: อัตราการเผาไหม้: เผาไหม้ปกติ; เผาไหม้ช้า; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrijeme gorenja: Normalno gorenje; Sporo gorenje; Ostalo
de: Brenngeschwindigkeit: Normaler Abbrand; Langsamer Abbrand; Sonstiges
ru: Скорость горения: Обычное горение; Медленное горение; Другое
pt-BR: Taxa de queima: Queima regular; Queima lenta; Outros
sk-SK: Burn rate: Bežné horenie; Pomalé horenie; Iné
lt-LT: Degimo greitis: Įprastas degimas; Lėtas degimas; Kitas
nl: Brandsnelheid: Normale branding; Trage branding; Overig
el: Ρυθμός καύσης: Κανονική καύση; Αργή καύση; Άλλη